Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5128.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "specie legal tender act". Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "Person" means an individual or a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, governmental entity, or other legal entity. (b) "Specie legal tender" means either of the following: (i) Gold or silver coin that is issued by the United States. (ii) Any other gold or silver coin or bullion if either of the following conditions apply: (A) A court of competent jurisdiction issues a final, unappealable judgment or order determining that this state may recognize the gold or silver coin or bullion as legal tender in this state. (B) A United States law does either of the following: (I) Provides that the gold or silver coin or bullion is legal tender in this state. (II) Allows this state to recognize the gold or silver coin or bullion as legal tender in this state. (c) Specie legal tender does not include a central bank digital currency. Sec. 3. (1) Specie legal tender is legal tender in this state. A person may keep and use specie legal tender. Except as expressly provided by contract, a person shall not compel another person to tender or accept specie legal tender. (2) A central bank digital currency is not legal tender in this state. Sec. 4. A governmental entity shall not do any of the following: (a) Except as otherwise authorized by law, seize from a person specie legal tender that is owned by the person. (b) Enforce or attempt to enforce a law that infringes on the right of a person to keep and use specie legal tender. (c) Restrict the ability of a person to acquire specie legal tender or use specie legal tender in a transaction. (d) Enact or enforce a law that discriminates or favors 1 means of legal tender in the course of a transaction over another means of legal tender.